Washington statutes.
RCW 44.73.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that Washington is committed to economic development and supporting the tourism industry, and that economic development is achieved by promoting the state and the goods produced around the state. The legislature further finds that tourism is encouraged providing a memorable experience and an opportunity for visitors to take something back home with them to remind them of this experience. There are many visitors every day to the legislative building, including tourists, school children, and people from around the state visiting the state capitol. These visitors offer an opportunity for the state to showcase its products and history. Therefore, the legislature finds that a gift center in the legislative building would be an appropriate response to this opportunity, and further, that such a gift center could provide a source of revenue to help fund the oral history program and to pay for the restoration and repurchase of historical capitol furnishings.

[ 2007 c 453 s 1.]